District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.12

Dual capacity.

A person may be both a general partner and a limited partner. A person that is both a general and limited partner shall have the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided by this chapter and the partnership agreement in each of those capacities. When the person acts as a general partner, the person shall be subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for general partners. When the person acts as a limited partner, the person shall be subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for limited partners.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(F), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 29-701.10 as § 29-701.12.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 113 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.